New York, session 2025-2026, A5292.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 11-0715 of the environmental conservation law is 2 amended by adding a new subdivision 4-a to read as follows: 3 4-a. A person, resident in the state for at least thirty days imme- 4 diately prior to the date of application, who has a disability, as such 5 term is defined pursuant to subdivision twenty-one of section two 6 hundred ninety-two of the executive law, is entitled to receive a fish- 7 ing license for which such person is eligible, renewable each year for a 8 five dollar fee. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 10 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09132-01-5